District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

15-706

Clerk’s fees in United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

Repealed.

June 19, 1986, 100 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 99-336, § 4(b)(5)

History

1981 Ed., § 15-706.

Prior Codifications